North Dakota, session 69, HB1096.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATIVE ASSEMBLY OF NORTH DAKOTA:
SECTION 1. AMENDMENT. Section 57-40.6-04 of the North Dakota Century Code is amended
and reenacted as follows:
57-40.6-04. Fee collection procedure.
An assessed communications service provider may retain the actual costs of administration in
collection of the fee and any telephone exchange access service provider charges for 911 database
management, not to exceed five two and one - hal f percent of the fee collected. The fee proceeds must
be paid by the assessed communications service provider within thirty days after it is collected from the
subscriber or customer unless the provider has fewer than ten subscribers or customers in a
jurisdiction, in which case the provider may pay the proceeds quarterly.

H. B. NO. 1096 - PAGE 2
____________________________ ____________________________
Speaker of the House President of the Senate
____________________________ ____________________________
Chief Clerk of the House Secretary of the Senate
This certifies that the within bill originated in the House of Representatives of the Sixty-ninth Legislative
Assembly of North Dakota and is known on the records of that body as House Bill No. 1096.
House Vote: Yeas 89 Nays 0 Absent 5
Senate Vote: Yeas 43 Nays 2 Absent 2
____________________________
Chief Clerk of the House
Received by the Governor at ________M. on _____________________________________, 2025.
Approved at ________M. on __________________________________________________, 2025.
____________________________
Governor
Filed in this office this ___________day of _______________________________________, 2025,
at ________ o’clock ________M.
____________________________
Secretary of State